Florida, session 2026, SB1290.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 94 95 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âRecovery Residence 96 Accountability and Protection Act of 2025.â 97 Section 2.âSubsections (5), (9), (39), and (40) of section 98 397.311, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 99 397.311âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, except part 100 VIII, the term: 101 (5)ââCertified Recovery residenceâ means a recovery 102 residence that holds a valid certificate of compliance and is 103 actively managed by a certified recovery residence 104 administrator. 105 (a)âA Level I certified recovery residence houses 106 individuals in recovery who have completed treatment, with a 107 minimum of 9 months of sobriety. A Level I certified recovery 108 residence may be is democratically run by the members who reside 109 in the home, or have a person designated as a house manager or a 110 peer leader who has a lived experience in recovery available for 111 resident oversight and support. Residents are expected to follow 112 rules outlined in a resident handbook. Residents must pay rent 113 and work toward achieving realistic and defined milestones 114 within a chosen recovery path. 115 (b)âA Level II certified recovery residence encompasses the 116 traditional perspectives of sober living homes. Residents are 117 monitored by There is oversight from a house manager who has 118 lived experience with living in recovery, and. Residents are 119 expected to follow rules outlined in a resident handbook 120 provided by the certified recovery residence administrator. 121 Residents must pay rent dues, if applicable, and work toward 122 achieving realistic and defined milestones within a chosen 123 recovery path. Residents who are receiving outpatient services 124 from a licensed service provider are permitted so long as the 125 Level II recovery residence has no affiliation, pecuniary or 126 otherwise, with that licensed service provider. 127 (c)âA Level III certified recovery residence delivers 128 weekly nonclinical structured programming, including peer-based 129 and other recovery support services such as recovery and 130 resiliency groups, person-driven recovery plans, 12-step 131 immersion, faith-based services, or some other form of 132 nonclinical recovery services or programming, and life skills 133 development programming such as meal preparation, job readiness, 134 or budgeting. A Level III certified recovery residence provides 135 offers higher supervision by staff with formal training to 136 ensure resident accountability. Level III certified recovery 137 residences support populations that need more intense support in 138 developing recovery capital than provided by Level I or Level II 139 recovery residences. Such residences must be are staffed 24 140 hours a day, 7 days a week, and offer residents peer-support 141 services, which may include, but are not limited to, life skill 142 mentoring, recovery planning, and meal preparation. Clinical 143 services may be procured through unaffiliated third parties, 144 however, such services may not be performed at the residence. 145 Such residences are most appropriate for persons who require a 146 more structured environment during early recovery from 147 addiction. 148 (d)âA Level IV certified recovery residence is a residence 149 offered, referred to, or provided by, a licensed service 150 provider to its patients who are required to reside at the 151 residence while receiving intensive outpatient and higher levels 152 of outpatient care. Such residences must be are staffed 24 hours 153 a day and combine outpatient licensable services with recovery 154 residential living. Residents are required to follow a treatment 155 plan and attend group and individual sessions, in addition to 156 developing a recovery plan within the social model of living in 157 a sober lifestyle. No Clinical services may not be are provided 158 at the residence and all licensable services are provided 159 offsite. 160 (9)ââCommunity housingâ means a certified recovery 161 residence offered, referred to, or provided by a licensed 162 service provider that provides housing to its patients who are 163 required to reside at the residence while receiving intensive 164 outpatient and higher levels of outpatient care. A certified 165 recovery residence used by a licensed service provider which 166 that meets the definition of community housing shall be 167 classified as a Level IV level of support, as described in 168 subsection (5). 169 (39)ââRecovery residenceâ or âcertified recovery residenceâ 170 means a residential dwelling unit, whether single- or multi 171 family, the community housing component of a licensed day or 172 night treatment facility with community housing, or any other 173 form of group housing, which is represented, offered, or 174 advertised to the public as providing a living environment for 175 persons recovering from substance use disorders. A recovery 176 residence must hold a valid certificate of compliance pursuant 177 to s. 397.487 through any means, including oral, written, 178 electronic, or printed means, by any person or entity as a 179 residence that provides a peer-supported, alcohol-free, and 180 drug-free living environment. 181 (40)ââRecovery residence administratorâ means the person 182 responsible for overall management of the recovery residence who 183 holds a valid certificate of compliance pursuant to s. 397.4871, 184 including, but not limited to, the supervision of residents and 185 staff employed by, or volunteering for, the residence. 186 Section 3.âSection 397.487, Florida Statutes, is amended to 187 read: 188 397.487âVoluntary Certification of recovery residences.â 189 (1)âThe Legislature finds that recovery residences play a 190 vital role in sustaining long-term recovery from substance use 191 disorders by providing safe, stable, and supported living 192 environments. The Legislature further finds that the absence of 193 consistent statewide standards for the ownership, management, 194 and operation of recovery residences has led to confusion, 195 exploitation, and consumer harm among individuals seeking 196 recovery. The Legislature enacted this section to establish a 197 framework for voluntary certification, but experience has 198 demonstrated that voluntary compliance alone is insufficient to 199 ensure resident safety, the integrity of Floridaâs recovery 200 housing system, and the protection of persons in recovery, who 201 have historically been subjected to exploitation and abuse by 202 unscrupulous operators of uncertified recovery residences in 203 this state. It is the intent of the Legislature to strengthen 204 the protections originally established by this section by 205 requiring the certification of all recovery residences, revising 206 levels of structured support to reflect the needs of persons in 207 recovery, and ensuring that certified recovery residence 208 administrators are qualified, accountable, and ethically bound 209 to uphold the highest standards of care. The Legislature further 210 finds that recovery residences, when operated in accordance with 211 nationally recognized standards, reduce relapse, homelessness, 212 and recidivism, thereby promoting individual recovery, family 213 reunification, and resident safety, while reducing the overall 214 cost of care to the state a person suffering from addiction has 215 a higher success rate of achieving long-lasting sobriety when 216 given the opportunity to build a stronger foundation by living 217 in a recovery residence while receiving treatment or after 218 completing treatment. The Legislature further finds that this 219 state and its subdivisions have a legitimate state interest in 220 protecting these persons, who represent a vulnerable consumer 221 population in need of adequate housing. It is the intent of the 222 Legislature to protect persons who reside in a recovery 223 residence. 224 (2)âAny person, entity, or organization that owns, 225 operates, or manages a recovery residence must obtain and 226 maintain certification in accordance with this section. It is 227 unlawful to operate a recovery residence without such 228 certification. Recovery residences operating as of July 1, 2026, 229 must apply for certification no later than January 1, 2027, and 230 may operate conditionally during the application process, unless 231 suspended or denied. The department shall approve at least one 232 credentialing entity with demonstrated expertise in recovery 233 housing operations and compliance monitoring which is affiliated 234 with the National Alliance for Recovery Residences by December 235 1, 2015, for the purpose of developing and administering a 236 voluntary certification program for recovery residences. The 237 approved credentialing entity shall: 238 (a)âEstablish recovery residence certification 239 requirements. 240 (b)âEstablish procedures to: 241 1.âAdminister the application, certification, 242 recertification, and disciplinary processes. 243 2.âMonitor and inspect a recovery residence and its staff 244 to ensure compliance with certification requirements. 245 3.âInterview and evaluate residents, employees, and 246 volunteer staff on their knowledge and application of 247 certification requirements. 248 (c)âProvide training for owners, managers, and staff. 249 (d)âDevelop a code of ethics. 250 (e)âEstablish application, inspection, and annual 251 certification renewal fees. The application fee may not exceed 252 $100. Any onsite inspection fee shall reflect actual costs for 253 inspections. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed 254 $100. 255 (3)âA credentialing entity shall require the recovery 256 residence to submit the following documents with the completed 257 application and fee: 258 (a)âA policy and procedures manual containing: 259 1.âJob descriptions for all staff positions. 260 2.âDrug-testing procedures and requirements. 261 3.âA prohibition on the premises against alcohol, 262 marijuana, illegal drugs, and the use of prescribed medications 263 by an individual other than the individual for whom the 264 medication is prescribed. For the purposes of this subsection, 265 âmarijuanaâ includes marijuana that has been certified by a 266 qualified physician for medical use in accordance with s. 267 381.986. 268 4.âPolicies to support a residentâs recovery efforts. 269 5.âA good neighbor policy to address neighborhood concerns 270 and complaints. 271 (b)âRules for residents. 272 (c)âCopies of all forms provided to residents. 273 (d)âIntake procedures. 274 (e)âSexual predator and sexual offender registry compliance 275 policy. 276 (f)âRelapse policy. 277 (g)âFee schedule. 278 (h)âRefund policy. 279 (i)âEviction procedures and policy. 280 (j)âCode of ethics. 281 (k)âProof of insurance. 282 (l)âProof of background screening. 283 (m)âProof of satisfactory fire, safety, and health 284 inspections. 285 (4)âA certified recovery residence must be actively managed 286 by a certified recovery residence administrator. All 287 applications for certification must include the name of the 288 certified recovery residence administrator who will be actively 289 managing the applicant recovery residence. Active management of 290 a recovery residence includes: 291 (a)âEnsuring compliance with certification requirements, 292 including site management, ethical practices, and record 293 keeping. 294 (b)âOverseeing staff management and training. 295 (c)âDeveloping programs and activities that provide 296 recovery support to residents. 297 (d)âCrisis management, including interaction with medical 298 professionals, law enforcement, and emergency management. 299 (e)âContinuous improvement in recovery management and 300 addiction recovery support. 301 (5)âUpon receiving a complete application, a credentialing 302 entity shall conduct an onsite inspection of the recovery 303 residence. 304 (6)âAll owners, directors, and chief financial officers of 305 an applicant recovery residence are subject to level 2 306 background screening as provided under s. 408.809 and chapter 307 435. A recovery residence is ineligible for certification, and a 308 credentialing entity must shall deny a recovery residenceâs 309 application, if any owner, director, or chief financial officer 310 has been found guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or 311 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, any offense 312 listed in s. 408.809(4) or s. 435.04(2) unless the department 313 has issued an exemption under s. 435.07. Exemptions from 314 disqualification applicable to service provider personnel 315 pursuant to s. 397.4073 or s. 435.07 shall apply to this 316 subsection. In accordance with s. 435.04, the department shall 317 notify the credentialing agency of an ownerâs, directorâs, or 318 chief financial officerâs eligibility based on the results of 319 his or her background screening. 320 (7)âA credentialing entity shall issue a certificate of 321 compliance upon approval of the recovery residenceâs application 322 and inspection. The certification shall automatically terminates 323 terminate 1 year after issuance if not renewed. 324 (8)âOnsite follow-up followup monitoring of a certified 325 recovery residence may be conducted by the credentialing entity 326 to determine continuing compliance with certification 327 requirements. The credentialing entity shall inspect each 328 certified recovery residence at least annually to ensure 329 compliance. 330 (a)âA credentialing entity may suspend or revoke a 331 certification if the recovery residence is not in compliance 332 with any provision of this section or has failed to remedy any 333 deficiency identified by the credentialing entity within the 334 time period specified. 335 (b)âA certified recovery residence must notify the 336 credentialing entity within 3 business days after the removal of 337 the recovery residenceâs certified recovery residence 338 administrator due to termination, resignation, or any other 339 reason. The certified recovery residence has 90 days to retain a 340 certified recovery residence administrator. The credentialing 341 entity must revoke the certificate of compliance of any 342 certified recovery residence that fails to comply with this 343 paragraph. 344 (c)âIf a certified recovery residenceâs administrator has 345 been removed due to termination, resignation, or any other 346 reason and had been previously approved to actively manage more 347 than 50 residents pursuant to s. 397.4871(8)(b), the certified 348 recovery residence has 90 days to retain another certified 349 recovery residence administrator pursuant to s. 397.4871. The 350 credentialing entity must revoke the certificate of compliance 351 of any certified recovery residence that fails to comply with 352 this paragraph. 353 (d)âIf any owner, director, or chief financial officer of a 354 certified recovery residence is arrested and awaiting 355 disposition for or found guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty 356 or nolo contendere to, regardless of whether adjudication is 357 withheld, any offense listed in s. 435.04(2) while acting in 358 that capacity, the certified recovery residence must immediately 359 remove the person from that position and notify the 360 credentialing entity within 3 business days after such removal. 361 The credentialing entity must revoke the certificate of 362 compliance of a certified recovery residence that fails to meet 363 these requirements. 364 (e)âA credentialing entity shall revoke a certified 365 recovery residenceâs certificate of compliance if the certified 366 recovery residence provides false or misleading information to 367 the credentialing entity at any time. 368 (f)âAny decision by a department-recognized credentialing 369 entity to deny, revoke, or suspend a certification, or otherwise 370 impose sanctions on a certified recovery residence, is 371 reviewable by the department. Upon receiving an adverse 372 determination, the certified recovery residence may request an 373 administrative hearing pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57(1) 374 within 30 days after completing any appeals process offered by 375 the credentialing entity or the department, as applicable. 376 (9)âA person may not advertise to the public, in any way or 377 by any medium whatsoever, any recovery residence as a âcertified 378 recovery residenceâ unless such recovery residence has first 379 secured a certificate of compliance under this section. A person 380 who violates this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the first 381 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 382 (10)(a)âA certified recovery residence may allow a minor 383 child to visit a parent who is a resident of the recovery 384 residence, provided that a minor child may not visit or remain 385 in the recovery residence between the hours of 9 p.m. and 7 a.m. 386 unless: 387 1.âA court makes a specific finding that such visitation is 388 in the best interest of the minor child; or 389 2.âThe recovery residence is a specialized residence for 390 pregnant women or parents whose children reside with them. Such 391 recovery residences may allow children to visit or reside in the 392 residence if the parent does not yet have a time-sharing plan 393 pursuant to s. 61.13, provided that the parent files with the 394 court for establishment of a plan within 14 days of moving into 395 the residence. 396 (b)âA certified recovery residence may not allow a minor 397 child to visit a parent who is a resident of the recovery 398 residence at any time if any resident of the recovery residence 399 is currently required to register as a sexual predator under s. 400 775.21 or as a sexual offender under s. 943.0435. 401 (11)âNotwithstanding any landlord and tenant rights and 402 obligations under chapter 83, a recovery residence that is 403 certified under this section and has a discharge policy approved 404 by a department-recognized credentialing entity may immediately 405 discharge or transfer a resident in accordance with that policy 406 under any of the following circumstances: 407 (a)âThe discharge or transfer is necessary for the 408 residentâs welfare. 409 (b)âThe residentâs needs cannot be met at the recovery 410 residence. 411 (c)âThe health and safety of other residents or recovery 412 residence employees is at risk or would be at risk if the 413 resident continues to live at the recovery residence. 414 (12)âAny person discharged from a recovery residence under 415 subsection (11) who willfully refuses to depart after being 416 warned by the owner or an authorized employee of the recovery 417 residence commits the offense of trespass in a recovery 418 residence, a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 419 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 420 (13)(a)âConsistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act 421 and the Fair Housing Act, a recovery residence may not deny 422 admission to an individual solely because he or she is 423 prescribed federally approved medication for the treatment of a 424 substance use disorder. 425 (b)âA recovery residence may conduct an individualized 426 assessment to determine whether admitting a specific individual 427 would fundamentally alter the nature of the recovery residenceâs 428 operations based on objective, individualized evidence, and not 429 on program philosophy or generalized assumptions. 430 (c)âThe department shall adopt rules establishing 431 procedures for individualized assessments, documentation, 432 reasonable accommodations, and resident rights which are 433 consistent with federal guidance. 434 (d)âThis subsection may not be construed to authorize 435 blanket policies or program-wide exclusions of individuals who 436 take federally approved medication for the treatment of a 437 substance use disorder. 438 (e)âBeginning January 1, 2025, A certified recovery 439 residence may not deny an individual access to housing solely on 440 the basis that he or she has been prescribed federally approved 441 medication that assists with treatment for substance use 442 disorders; however, a recovery residence operating as a 100 443 percent abstinence-based program may restrict admission to 444 individuals currently using medication-assisted treatment if the 445 admission of such individuals would fundamentally alter the 446 nature of the programâs abstinence-based model, as authorized by 447 29 C.F.R. s. 35.130(b)(7). The department shall adopt rules to 448 define the term âabstinence-based recovery residenceâ and 449 establish standards ensuring transparency and consumer choice 450 consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act and the Fair 451 Housing Act by a licensed physician, a physicianâs assistant, or 452 an advanced practice registered nurse registered under s. 453 464.0123. 454 (14)âA local ordinance or regulation may not further 455 regulate the duration or frequency of a residentâs stay in a 456 certified recovery residence located within a multifamily zoning 457 district after June 30, 2024. This provision expires shall 458 expire July 1, 2026. 459 (15)(a)âBy January 1, 2026, the governing body of each 460 county or municipality shall adopt an ordinance establishing 461 procedures for the review and approval of certified recovery 462 residences within its jurisdiction. The ordinance must include a 463 process for requesting reasonable accommodations from any local 464 land use regulation that serves to prohibit the establishment of 465 a certified recovery residence. 466 (b)âAt a minimum, the ordinance must: 467 1.âBe consistent with the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 468 1988, 42 U.S.C. ss. 3601 et seq., and Title II of the Americans 469 with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 12131 et seq. 470 2.âEstablish a written application process for requesting a 471 reasonable accommodation for the establishment of a certified 472 recovery residence, which application must be submitted to the 473 appropriate local government office. 474 3.âRequire the local government to date stamp each 475 application upon receipt. If additional information is required, 476 the local government must notify the applicant in writing within 477 the first 30 days after receipt of the application and allow the 478 applicant at least 30 days to respond. 479 4.âRequire the local government to issue a final written 480 determination on the application within 60 days after receipt of 481 a completed application. The determination must: 482 a.âApprove the request in whole or in part, with or without 483 conditions; or 484 b.âDeny the request, stating with specificity the 485 objective, evidence-based reasons for denial and identifying any 486 deficiencies or actions necessary for reconsideration. 487 5.âProvide that if a final written determination is not 488 issued within 60 days after receipt of a completed application, 489 the request is deemed approved unless the parties agree in 490 writing to a reasonable extension of time. 491 6.âRequire that the application include, at a minimum: 492 a.âThe name and contact information of the applicant or the 493 applicantâs authorized representative; 494 b.âThe property address and parcel identification number; 495 and 496 c.âA description of the accommodation requested and the 497 specific regulation or policy from which relief is sought. 498 (c)âThe ordinance may establish additional requirements for 499 the review or approval of reasonable accommodation requests for 500 establishing a certified recovery residence, provided such 501 requirements are consistent with federal law and do not conflict 502 with this subsection. 503 (d)âThe ordinance may not require public hearings beyond 504 the minimum required by law to grant the requested 505 accommodation. 506 (e)âThe ordinance may include provisions for the revocation 507 of a granted accommodation of a certified recovery residence for 508 cause, including, but not limited to, a violation of the 509 conditions of approval or the lapse, revocation, or failure to 510 maintain certification or licensure required under this section, 511 if not reinstated within 180 days. 512 (f)âThe ordinance and establishment of a reasonable 513 accommodation process does not relieve the local government from 514 its obligations under the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 515 42 U.S.C. ss. 3601 et seq., and Title II of the Americans with 516 Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 12131 et seq. The regulation for 517 which the applicant is seeking a reasonable accommodation must 518 not facially discriminate against or otherwise disparately 519 impact the applicant. 520 (16)âThe application of this section does not supersede any 521 current or future declaration or declaration of condominium 522 adopted pursuant to chapter 718; any cooperative document 523 adopted pursuant to chapter 719; or any declaration or 524 declaration of covenant adopted pursuant to chapter 720. 525 Section 4.âSubsections (1), (2), (7), and (8) of section 526 397.4871, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 527 397.4871âRecovery residence administrator certification.â 528 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that a recovery 529 residence administrator voluntarily earn and maintain 530 certification from a credentialing entity approved by the 531 Department of Children and Families. The Legislature further 532 intends that certification ensure that an administrator has the 533 competencies necessary to appropriately respond to the needs of 534 residents, to maintain residence standards, and to meet 535 residence certification requirements. 536 (2)âThe department shall approve at least one credentialing 537 entity by December 1, 2015, for the purpose of developing and 538 administering a voluntary credentialing program for 539 administrators. The department shall approve any credentialing 540 entity that the department endorses pursuant to s. 397.321(15) 541 if the credentialing entity also meets the requirements of this 542 section. The approved credentialing entity shall: 543 (a)âEstablish recovery residence administrator core 544 competencies, certification requirements, testing instruments, 545 and recertification requirements. 546 (b)âEstablish a process to administer the certification 547 application, award, and maintenance processes. 548 (c)âDevelop and administer: 549 1.âA code of ethics and disciplinary process. 550 2.âBiennial continuing education requirements and annual 551 certification renewal requirements. 552 3.âAn education provider program to approve training 553 entities that are qualified to provide precertification training 554 to applicants and continuing education opportunities to 555 certified persons. 556 (7)âA person may not advertise himself or herself to the 557 public, in any way or by any medium whatsoever, as a âcertified 558 recovery residence administratorâ unless he or she has first 559 secured a certificate of compliance under this section. A person 560 who violates this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the first 561 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 562 (8)(a)âA certified recovery residence administrator must 563 demonstrate the ability to effectively and appropriately respond 564 to the needs of residents, to maintain residence standards, and 565 to meet the certification requirements of this section. 566 (b)âA certified recovery residence administrator may not 567 actively manage more than 50 residents at any given time unless 568 written justification is provided to, and approved by, the 569 credentialing entity as to how the administrator is able to 570 effectively and appropriately respond to the needs of the 571 residents, to maintain residence standards, and to meet the 572 residence certification requirements of this section. However, a 573 certified recovery residence administrator may not actively 574 manage more than 100 residents at any given time. 575 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a Level IV certified 576 recovery residence operating as community housing as defined in 577 s. 397.311(9), which residence is actively managed by a 578 certified recovery residence administrator approved for 100 579 residents under this section and is wholly owned or controlled 580 by a licensed service provider, may: 581 1.âActively manage up to 150 residents so long as the 582 licensed service provider maintains a service provider 583 personnel-to-patient ratio of 1 to 8 and maintains onsite 584 supervision at the residence during times when residents are at 585 the residence with a personnel-to-resident ratio of 1 to 10. 586 2.âActively manage up to 300 residents, so long as the 587 licensed service provider maintains a service provider 588 personnel-to-patient ratio of 1 to 8 and maintains onsite 589 supervision at the residence during times when residents are at 590 the residence with a personnel-to-resident ratio of 1 to 6. 591 592 A certified recovery residence administrator who has been 593 removed by a certified recovery residence due to termination, 594 resignation, or any other reason may not continue to actively 595 manage more than 50 residents for another service provider or 596 certified recovery residence without being approved by the 597 credentialing entity. 598 Section 5.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 397.4873, 599 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 600 397.4873âReferrals to or from recovery residences; 601 prohibitions; penalties.â 602 (1)âA service provider licensed under this part may not 603 make a referral of a prospective, current, or discharged patient 604 to, or accept a referral of such a patient from, a recovery 605 residence unless the recovery residence holds a valid 606 certificate of compliance as provided in s. 397.487 and is 607 actively managed by a certified recovery residence administrator 608 as provided in s. 397.4871. 609 (2)âSubsection (1) does not apply to: 610 (a)âA licensed service provider under contract with a 611 managing entity as defined in s. 394.9082. 612 (b)âReferrals by a recovery residence to a licensed service 613 provider when the recovery residence or its owners, directors, 614 operators, or employees do not benefit, directly or indirectly, 615 from the referral. 616 (c)âReferrals made before July 1, 2018, by a licensed 617 service provider to that licensed service providerâs wholly 618 owned subsidiary. 619 (d)âthe referral of a patient to, or acceptance of a 620 referral of such a patient from, a recovery residence that has 621 no direct or indirect financial or other referral relationship 622 with the licensed service provider and that is democratically 623 operated by its residents pursuant to a charter from an entity 624 recognized or sanctioned by Congress, and where the residence or 625 any resident of the residence does not receive a benefit, 626 directly or indirectly, for the referral. 627 Section 6.âSubsection (11) of section 633.208, Florida 628 Statutes, is amended to read: 629 633.208âMinimum firesafety standards.â 630 (11)âNotwithstanding subsection (8), a single-family or 631 two-family dwelling that is a certified recovery residence, as 632 defined in s. 397.311, or that is a recovery residence, as 633 defined in s. 397.311, that has a charter from an entity 634 recognized or sanctioned by Congress may not be reclassified for 635 purposes of enforcing the Florida Fire Prevention Code solely 636 due to such use. 637 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 638 made by this act to section 397.311, Florida Statutes, in 639 references thereto, paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (9) of 640 section 61.13, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 641 61.13âSupport of children; parenting and time-sharing; 642 powers of court.â 643 (9)(a)âA time-sharing plan may not require that a minor 644 child visit a parent who is a resident of a recovery residence, 645 as defined by s. 397.311, between the hours of 9 p.m. and 7 646 a.m., unless the court makes a specific finding that such 647 visitation is in the best interest of the child. In determining 648 the best interest of the minor child in such cases, the court 649 shall take into account factors including, but not limited to, 650 whether the parent resides in a specialized residence for 651 pregnant women or parents whose children reside with them, the 652 number of adults living in the recovery residence, and the 653 parentâs level of recovery. 654 (b)âA time-sharing plan that does not mention a recovery 655 residence may not be interpreted to require that a minor child 656 visit a parent who is a resident of a recovery residence, as 657 defined by s. 397.311, between the hours of 9 p.m. and 7 a.m. 658 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 659 made by this act to section 397.311, Florida Statutes, in 660 references thereto, subsection (10) of section 553.80, Florida 661 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 662 553.80âEnforcement.â 663 (10)âA single-family or two-family dwelling that is 664 converted into a certified recovery residence, as defined in s. 665 397.311, or a recovery residence, as defined in s. 397.311, that 666 has a charter from an entity recognized or sanctioned by 667 Congress does not have a change of occupancy as defined in the 668 Florida Building Code solely due to such conversion. 669 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 670 made by this act to section 397.311, Florida Statutes, in 671 references thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 672 893.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 673 893.13âProhibited acts; penalties.â 674 (1) 675 (h)âExcept as authorized by this chapter, a person may not 676 sell, manufacture, or deliver, or possess with intent to sell, 677 manufacture, or deliver, a controlled substance in, on, or 678 within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising a mental 679 health facility, as that term is used in chapter 394; a health 680 care facility licensed under chapter 395 which provides 681 substance abuse treatment; a licensed service provider as 682 defined in s. 397.311; a facility providing services that 683 include clinical treatment, intervention, or prevention as 684 described in s. 397.311(27); a recovery residence as defined in 685 s. 397.311; an assisted living facility as defined in chapter 686 429; or a pain management clinic as defined in s. 687 458.3265(1)(a)1.c. or s. 459.0137(1)(a)1.c. A person who 688 violates this paragraph with respect to: 689 1.âA controlled substance named or described in s. 690 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. 691 commits a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 692 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 693 2.âA controlled substance named or described in s. 694 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., 695 (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) commits a felony of 696 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 697 775.083, or s. 775.084. 698 3.âAny other controlled substance, except as lawfully sold, 699 manufactured, or delivered, must be sentenced to pay a $500 fine 700 and to serve 100 hours of public service in addition to any 701 other penalty prescribed by law. 702 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.